Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DELISTING LITTLE ROCK CREEK AS TROUT STREAM; RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of natural resources must amend Minnesota Rules, part 6264.0050, subpart 4, to remove the designation of Little Rock Creek in Morrison County as a trout stream and must no longer stock the stream with trout. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may use the good cause exemption under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388, subdivision 1, clause (3), to adopt rules under this section, and Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386, does not apply except as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388. new text end